Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS
SECTION 1. (1) Sections  2 to 5 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
161.290 to 161.373.
(2) ORS 161.360, 161.365 and 161.370 are added to and made  a part of sections 2 to 5 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Certified evaluator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 161.309.
(2) “Community restoration services” means services and treatment  necessary to safely
allow a defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed in the  community, which may include
supervision by pretrial services.
(3) “Hospital level of care” means that a defendant requires the type of  care provided by
an inpatient hospital in order to gain or regain fitness to proceed.
(4) “Public safety concerns” means that the defendant presents a risk to self  or to the
public if not hospitalized or in custody.
SECTION 3.
(1) A recommendation provided by a certified evaluator, pursuant to sections
2 to 5 of this 2021  Act, that a defendant requires a hospital level of care due to the acuity
of the  defendant’s symptoms must be based upon the defendant’s current diagnosis and
symptomology, the defendant’s  current ability to engage in treatment, present safety con-
cerns relating to the  defendant and any other pertinent information known to the evaluator.
If the  defendant is in a placement in a facility, the evaluator may defer to the treatment
provider’s recommendation regarding whether a hospital level of care is needed.
(2) A determination by a community mental  health program director, or the director’s
designee, pursuant to sections  2 to 5 of this 2021 Act, that appropriate community restora-
tion services are not present and available in the community  must include information con-
cerning the specific services necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain or  regain fitness
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 1
to proceed in the community and must specify the  necessary services that are not present
and available in the community.
(3)(a) Reports resulting from examinations performed by a  certified evaluator, and doc-
uments containing the recommendations of  or resulting from consultations with a commu-
nity mental health program director or the director’s designee,  prepared under sections 2 to
5 of this 2021  Act, and any document submitted to the court by a state mental hospital re-
lated to the proceedings under sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act, are confidential and may  be
made available only:
(A) To the court,  prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or  designee, state
mental hospital and any facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(b) Any facility in which a defendant is housed may not use a report  or document de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this  subsection to support a disciplinary action against the de-
fendant.
(c) Nothing in this subsection  prohibits the prosecuting attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the  prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report or
document described in paragraph (a) of this subsection with  witnesses or victims as other-
wise permitted by law.
(4) The  court shall ensure that an order entered under sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act
is provided, by the end of the next judicial  day, to any entity ordered to provide restoration
services.
(5) Unless  the court orders otherwise or either party objects, a defendant committed to
a state mental hospital or other facility, or a  certified evaluator or other expert witness,
may attend hearings  held under sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act via simultaneous electronic
transmission.
FITNESS TO PROCEED GENERALLY
SECTION 4.
(1) If at any time  the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to
proceed, the court shall further determine  whether there is a substantial probability that the
defendant, in the foreseeable future, will gain or  regain fitness to proceed. If the court de-
termines that there is no substantial probability  that the defendant, in the foreseeable fu-
ture, will gain or regain fitness to  proceed, the court shall dismiss, without prejudice, all
charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290.
(2)(a) The superintendent of the hospital  or director of the facility in which the defendant
is committed under ORS 161.370 or a person examining the defendant as a condition of  re-
lease to community restoration services shall notify the court if the defendant gains  or re-
gains fitness to proceed.
(b) A party to the  case may notify the court if the defendant has gained or regained fit-
ness to proceed.
(c) The court may, upon its own motion or the request of  either party, hold a hearing
to determine whether the defendant has  gained or regained fitness to proceed. If the court
determines that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to  proceed, the court shall re-
sume the  criminal proceeding unless the court determines that so much time has elapsed
since the commitment or  release of the defendant to community restoration services that
it would be unjust to resume the criminal  proceeding. If the court determines that it would
be unjust to resume the criminal proceeding, the court, on  motion of either party, may dis-
miss the charge and  may order the defendant to be discharged or cause a proceeding to be
commenced forthwith under ORS 426.070 to 426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 2
(3) If the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed, the defendant shall be given
credit against each charge alleged in the accusatory instrument for each day  the defendant
was committed under ORS 161.370 to the custody of a state  mental hospital, or to the cus-
tody of a secure intensive  community inpatient facility designated by the Oregon Health
Authority.
(4) Notwithstanding the suspension of the  criminal proceeding under ORS 161.370 (2), the
fact that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection through counsel
and without the  personal participation of the defendant on the grounds that the indictment
is insufficient, that the statute of limitations has run, that double jeopardy principles  apply
or upon any other ground at the discretion of the court which  the court deems susceptible
of fair determination prior to trial.
(5) At the time that the court determines  that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed
under ORS 161.370 (2),  the court shall notify the defendant in writing that federal law pro-
hibits the defendant from purchasing or possessing a  firearm unless the person obtains relief
from the prohibition under federal law. The court shall  again notify the defendant in writing
of the prohibition if the court finds  that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to
proceed under subsection (2) of this section.
COMMITTED DEFENDANTS
SECTION 5.
(1) The superintendent of a state mental hospital or director of a facility  to
which the defendant is committed under ORS 161.370 shall cause the defendant  to be evalu-
ated within 60 days from the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s  or director’s
custody, for the purpose of determining whether there is  a substantial probability that, in
the foreseeable future, the defendant will have fitness to proceed. In addition, the  super-
intendent or director shall:
(a) Immediately notify the committing court if the defendant, at  any time, gains or re-
gains fitness to proceed or if  there is no substantial probability that, within the foreseeable
future, the defendant will gain or regain fitness to proceed.
(b) Within 90 days of  the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s
custody, notify the committing court that:
(A) The defendant has present fitness to proceed;
(B) There is no substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the  defendant will
gain or regain fitness to proceed; or
(C) There is a substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the  defendant will
gain or regain fitness  to proceed. If the probability exists, the superintendent or director
shall give the court an estimate of the  time in which the defendant, with appropriate treat-
ment, is expected to gain or regain fitness to proceed.
(c) Notify the court if court-ordered involuntary medication is  necessary for the defend-
ant to gain or regain fitness to proceed and, if appropriate,  submit a report to the court
under ORS 161.372.
(2)(a) If the superintendent of  the state mental hospital or director of the facility to
which the defendant is committed determines that there is a substantial probability that, in
the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or regain fitness to proceed, unless the  court
otherwise orders, the  defendant shall remain in the superintendent’s or director’s custody
where the defendant shall receive treatment designed for the purpose of enabling the  de-
fendant to gain or regain fitness  to proceed. In keeping with the notice requirement under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the superintendent or  director shall, for the duration of the
defendant’s period of commitment, submit a progress report to  the committing court, con-
cerning the defendant’s fitness to proceed, at least  once every 180 days as measured from
the date of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s custody.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 3
(b) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of an
update to:
(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or
(B) An evaluation  conducted under subsection (1) of this section, if the defendant did not
receive an examination under ORS 161.365.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if  the most serious offense in the
charging instrument is a felony, and  the superintendent of the state mental hospital or di-
rector of the facility  to which the defendant is committed determines that a hospital level
of care is no longer necessary  due to present public safety concerns and the acuity of
symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, the superintendent or director  may
file notice of the determination  with the court. Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall
order that a community mental health program  director or the director’s designee, within
five judicial days:
(A) Consult with the defendant and  with any local entity that would be responsible for
providing community restoration services, if the defendant were to be  released in the com-
munity, to determine whether community restoration services are present and available  in
the community; and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this  section, if the most serious offense in the
charging instrument is  a felony, and the community mental health program director deter-
mines that community restoration services that would mitigate any risk  posed by the de-
fendant are present and available  in the community, the community mental health program
director may file notice of the determination with the court. Upon receipt of the notice,  the
court shall order that the superintendent of the state mental hospital  or director of the fa-
cility to which the defendant is committed, within five judicial days:
(A) Evaluate the defendant to determine whether a  hospital level of care is no longer
necessary due to present public safety concerns, or no longer  necessary due to the acuity
of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder; and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the evaluation.
(c) Within 10 judicial days of receiving the  recommendations described in paragraph (a)
or (b) of this subsection, the court shall  hold a hearing to determine an appropriate action
in accordance with ORS 161.370 (2)(c) as follows:
(A) If, after consideration of the factors and possible actions described in ORS  161.370
(2)(c) and any recommendations received under paragraph (a) or (b)  of this subsection, the
court determines that a hospital level of care is necessary due to public safety concerns or
the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and that based  on the
consultation or evaluation described in paragraph  (a) or (b) of this subsection, any informa-
tion provided by community-based mental health providers or any other sources, primary
and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, and any other information the court
finds to be trustworthy  and reliable, the appropriate community restoration services are not
present and available in the community, the court may continue the commitment of the de-
fendant.
(B) If the court does not make the determination described in  subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, the court shall terminate the  commitment and shall set a review hearing seven
days from the date of the commitment termination for any defendant remaining  in custody.
At the review hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information, determine  an ap-
propriate action in the case as described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and enter  an order in accord-
ance with the defendant’s constitutional rights to due process.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if  the most serious offense in the
charging instrument is a misdemeanor,  and the superintendent of the state mental hospital
or director of the facility to which  the defendant is committed determines that the defendant
no longer needs a hospital level of care due to the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 4
qualifying mental disorder or there are not present public safety concerns, the superinten-
dent or  director shall file notice of the determination with the court, along with recommen-
dations regarding the necessary community restoration services that would mitigate any risk
presented by the  defendant. Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall order that a com-
munity mental health program director or the director’s designee, within five judicial days:
(A) Consult with the defendant and with any local entity  that would be responsible for
providing community restoration services, if  the defendant were to be released in the com-
munity, to determine whether appropriate community restoration services are present and
available in the community; and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if the  most serious offense in the
charging instrument is a misdemeanor, and  the community mental health program director
determines that the community restoration services that would mitigate any  risk posed by
the defendant are present and available in the community,  the community mental health
program director may file notice of the determination with the  court. Upon receipt of the
notice, the court shall  order that the superintendent of the state mental hospital or director
of the facility to which the defendant is committed, within five judicial days:
(A) Evaluate the defendant to determine whether a  hospital level of care is no longer
necessary due to present public safety concerns, or no longer  necessary due to the acuity
of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder; and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the evaluation.
(c) Within 10 judicial days of receiving the  recommendations described in paragraph (a)
or (b) of this subsection, the court shall  hold a hearing to determine an appropriate action
in accordance with ORS 161.370 (2)(c) as follows:
(A) After consideration of the  factors and possible actions described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c),
the consultation or  evaluation and any recommendations described in paragraph (a) or (b)
of this subsection, and any other information the court finds to  be trustworthy and reliable,
the court may  continue the commitment of the defendant if the court makes written findings
that a hospital level of care is necessary due to public safety concerns and the  acuity of
symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying  mental disorder, and that appropriate community
restoration services are not present and available in the community.
(B) If the court does not make  the findings described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph, the court shall terminate the commitment and shall set  a review hearing seven days
from the date of the commitment termination for  any defendant remaining in custody. At
the review hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information, determine an  appro-
priate action in the case as described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and enter  an order in accordance
with the defendant’s constitutional rights to due process.
(5)(a) If a defendant remains committed under this section, the court  shall determine
within a reasonable period of time whether there is a substantial probability that,  in the
foreseeable future, the defendant  will gain or regain fitness to proceed. However, regardless
of the number of charges with which the defendant is accused, in no event shall  the de-
fendant be committed for longer than  whichever of the following, measured from the
defendant’s initial custody date, is shorter:
(A) Three years; or
(B) A period of time  equal to the maximum sentence the court could have imposed if the
defendant had been convicted.
(b) For purposes of calculating the  maximum period of commitment described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection:
(A) The initial custody date  is the date on which the defendant is first committed under
this section on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and
(B) The defendant shall be given credit against each charge alleged in the accusatory
instrument:
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 5
(i) For each day the defendant is  committed under this section, whether the days are
consecutive or are interrupted by a period of time during which the defendant has gained
or regained fitness to proceed; and
(ii) Unless the defendant is charged  on any charging instrument with aggravated murder
or a crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), for each day the  defendant is held in jail before and after
the date  the defendant is first committed, whether the days are consecutive or are inter-
rupted by a period of time during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed.
(c) The superintendent of the state mental hospital or director  of the facility to which
the defendant is committed shall notify the committing  court of the defendant’s impending
discharge 30 days before the date on which the superintendent  or director is required to
discharge the defendant under this subsection.
(6)(a) All notices required under  this section shall be filed with the court and may be filed
electronically. The clerk of the court shall cause copies of the notices to be delivered to  both
the district attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
(b) When the committing court receives a notice from the superintendent or  director
under subsection (1) of this section concerning the defendant’s progress or lack  thereof, or
under subsection (5) of this section concerning  the defendant’s impending discharge, the
committing court shall determine, after a hearing  if a hearing is requested, whether the
defendant presently has fitness to proceed.
(7) If at  any time the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the
court shall  further determine whether the defendant is entitled to discharge under sub-
section (5) of this section. If the court determines that the defendant is entitled to  discharge
under subsection (5) of this section,  the court shall dismiss, without prejudice, all charges
against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290.
EXAMINATION OF DEFENDANT
SECTION 6.
 ORS 161.365 is amended to read:
161.365. (1)(a) When the court has reason to doubt the defendant’s fitness  to proceed by reason
of incapacity as described in ORS 161.360, the court may call any  witness to assist it in reaching
its decision and , except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  shall order that a com-
munity mental health program director, or  the director’s designee, consult with the defendant and
with any local entity that would be responsible for [ supervising] providing community restoration
services to  the defendant if the defendant  were to be released in the community, to determine
whether [ services and supervision necessary to  safely allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to
proceed] appropriate community restoration services  are  present and  available in the commu-
nity. After the consultation, the program director or  the director’s designee shall provide to the
court a copy of the findings resulting from the consultation.
(b) If the defendant is charged  with one or more of the following offenses the court is
not required to, but may in its discretion,  order the consultation described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection:
(A) Aggravated murder;
(B) Murder in any degree;
(C) Attempted aggravated murder;
(D) Attempted murder in any degree;
(E) Manslaughter in any degree;
(E) Aggravated vehicular homicide;
(F) Arson in the first degree when  classified as crime category 10 of the sentencing
guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
(G) Assault in the first degree;
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 6
(H) Assault in the second degree;
(I) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(J) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(K) Rape in the first degree;
(L) Sodomy in the first degree;
(M) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree;
(N) Robbery in the first degree; or
(O) Robbery in the second degree.
(c) If the court determines  the assistance of a psychiatrist or psychologist would be helpful, the
court  may:
(A) Order that a psychiatric or psychological examination of  the defendant be conducted by a
certified evaluator and a report of the examination be prepared; or
(B) Order  the defendant to be committed for the purpose of an examination to a state mental
hospital or other facility designated by  the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least 18
years of age, or to a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the  authority if the
defendant is under 18 years of age. The state mental hospital  or other facility may retain custody
of a defendant committed under this paragraph for the duration necessary  to complete the exam-
ination of the defendant, not to exceed 30 days. The examination may include a period of  observa-
tion.
[(b)] (d) The court shall provide a copy of any order  entered under this subsection to the com-
munity mental health program director or designee and to the state mental hospital  or other facility
by the end of the next judicial day.
(2)(a) A defendant committed under subsection [ (1)(a)(B)] (1)(c)(B)  of  this section shall be
transported to the state mental hospital or other facility for the examination.
(b) At the conclusion of the examination, the superintendent of the state mental  hospital or the
superintendent’s designee or the director of the facility may:
(A) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
(B) Inform the court  and the parties that the defendant requires a hospital level of care due to
[the defendant’s dangerousness and ] the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder and request that the defendant remain at the  state mental hospital or other facility pending
a hearing or order under ORS 161.370.
[(c) If both parties consent, the court may, without holding a hearing, enter any  order authorized
by ORS 161.370 based on a report resulting from an examination conducted under this section. ]
(3) The report of an examination described in this section must  include, but is not necessarily
limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A statement of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a qualifying mental disorder, an opinion  as to whether the de-
fendant is incapacitated within the description set out in ORS 161.360; and
(d) If the defendant is incapacitated within  the description set out in ORS 161.360, a recom-
mendation of  treatment and services necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain capacity,
including whether a hospital  level of care is required due to [ the defendant’s dangerousness and ] the
acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder.
(4) Except when the defendant and the court both request to the contrary, the report may not
contain any findings or conclusions as to whether the defendant as a result of a qualifying  mental
disorder was subject to the provisions of ORS 161.295 or 161.300 at the time of the criminal  act
charged.
(5) If the examination by the certified evaluator cannot be conducted  by reason of the unwill-
ingness of the defendant to participate in the examination,  the report must so state and must in-
clude, if possible, an opinion as to whether  the unwillingness of the defendant was the result of a
qualifying mental disorder affecting [ capacity] fitness  to proceed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 7
(6)[(a)] The report resulting  from the examination of a defendant under this section may be filed
electronically and must be filed with the clerk of the court, who  shall cause copies to be delivered
to the district attorney and to counsel for defendant.
[(b) The entity or evaluator conducting the examination shall provide a copy of the report  resulting
from the examination to the community mental health program director or designee in: ]
[(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and ]
[(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence. ]
[(c) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be made available only: ]
[(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting  or defense at-
torney, defendant, community mental  health program director or designee and any facility in which the
defendant is housed; or ]
[(B) As ordered by a court. ]
[(d) Any facility in which a defendant is housed may not use a report prepared under this  section
to support a disciplinary action against the defendant. ]
[(e) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting attorney, defense attorney  or agent of the
prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing  the contents of a report prepared under this section
with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law. ]
(7)(a) When upon motion of the court or a financially eligible defendant,  the court has ordered
a psychiatric  or psychological examination of the defendant, a county or justice court shall order
the county to pay,  a municipal court shall order the city to pay,  and a circuit court shall order
the public defense services executive director to pay from funds available for the purpose:
(A) A reasonable fee if the examination of the defendant is  conducted by a certified evaluator
in private practice; and
(B) All costs including transportation of the defendant if the examination is conducted by a
certified evaluator in the employ of the Oregon Health  Authority or a community mental health
program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.670.
(b) When an examination is  ordered at the request or with the acquiescence of a defendant who
is determined not to be financially eligible, the examination shall be performed at the  defendant’s
expense. When an examination is ordered at the request of the prosecution, the county shall pay  for
the expense of the examination.
(8) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by  rule standards for the consultation described
in subsection (1) of this section.
[(9) As used in this section and  ORS 161.370, “certified evaluator” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 161.309. ]
DISPOSITION UPON FINDING OF LACK OF FITNESS
SECTION 7.  ORS 161.370 is amended to read:
161.370. (1)(a) When the defendant’s fitness to proceed is drawn in  question, the issue shall be
determined by the court.
(b) If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the defendant contests the finding of  the
report filed under ORS 161.365, the court may make the determination on the basis  of the report.
If the finding is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received  in
evidence in the hearing, the party who contests the finding has the right to summon and to cross-
examine any certified evaluator who submitted the report and to  offer evidence upon the issue.
Other evidence regarding the defendant’s fitness to proceed may be introduced by either party.
(2)(a) If the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding
against the defendant shall be suspended and  the court shall[ , at a hearing, ] proceed in accordance
with this subsection.
(b) After making the determination under paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the court shall re-
ceive a recommendation[ , to be considered at the hearing, ] from a  community mental health program
director or the director’s designee,  and from any local entity that would be responsible for [ super-
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 8
vising] treating  the defendant if the defendant were to be released in the community,  concerning
whether [ services and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to  gain or regain fitness to
proceed are available ] appropriate community restoration  services are present and available  in
the community.
(c) [ The court  and the parties shall at the hearing determine ] If the parties agree as to the
appropriate action under this section, the court may, after making all findings required by
law, enter any order authorized by this section. If  the parties do not agree as to the appro-
priate action, the court and the parties shall, at a hearing, consider  an appropriate action  in
the case, and the court shall make a determination and enter an order necessary to implement the
action. In determining the appropriate action, the court shall consider the primary and  secondary
release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the least restrictive option appropriate for the  defendant,
the needs of the defendant and the interests of justice. Actions may include but are not limited to:
(A) Commitment for the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed under  subsection (3) or
[(5)] (4) of this section;
(B) An order to engage in community restoration  services,  as recommended by the  community
mental health program director or designee , under subsection (6) of this section ;
[(C) Release on supervision; ]
[(D)] (C) Commencement  of a civil commitment proceeding under ORS 426.070 to 426.170, 426.701
or 427.235 to 427.290;
[(E)] (D)  Commencement of protective proceedings under ORS chapter 125; or
[(F)] (E)  Dismissal of the charges pursuant to ORS 135.755.
(d) If the court, while considering or ordering an  appropriate action under this subsection, [ de-
termines that the defendant does not require a hospital level of care due  to the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the  defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, but that ser-
vices and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed are
not available ] does not order the defendant committed to a state mental hospital or other fa-
cility, but finds that  appropriate community restoration services are not present and avail-
able in the community, for any defendant  remaining in custody after such determination, the court
shall set a review hearing seven days from the date of the determination under  paragraph (a) of this
subsection. At the review hearing, the  court shall consider all relevant information and determine
[an appropriate action in the case as described  in paragraph (c) of this subsection. If the defendant
remains in custody following the initial review hearing, the court shall hold further review hearings
every seven days thereafter until the defendant is no longer  in custody. ] if commitment to the state
mental hospital or other facility is appropriate under subsection (3) or (4) of this section,  or
if another action described in paragraph (c) of this subsection is appropriate. At the conclu-
sion of the hearing the court shall enter an order in accordance with the defendant’s con-
stitutional rights to due process.
(e) If the court determines that the appropriate action in the case  is an order for the
defendant to engage  in community restoration services, but the defendant has a pending
criminal case,  warrant or hold in one or more other jurisdictions, the other jurisdictions
shall, within two judicial days of becoming aware of the proceeding under this  section, com-
municate with the court and the other jurisdictions, if  applicable, to develop a plan to ad-
dress the interests of all jurisdictions in the defendant in a timely manner.
[(3)(a) Unless the court orders an  action other than commitment under subsection (2) of this section,
and except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, if  the court finds that the
defendant is dangerous  to self or others as a result of a qualifying mental disorder, that a hospital level
of care is necessary due  to the defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s
qualifying mental disorder, and that, based on the findings resulting from the  consultation described
in ORS 161.365 (1) and from any information provided  by community-based mental health providers
or any other sources, the services and supervision necessary to allow the defendant to gain or  regain
fitness to proceed are not available in the community, the court shall commit the  defendant to the cus-
tody of  the superintendent of a state mental hospital or director of a facility designated by the Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 9
Health Authority if the defendant is at least 18 years of age, or to the custody of the director of a secure
intensive community inpatient facility designated by the authority if  the defendant is under 18 years
of age.]
(3)(a) If the most serious offense in the charging  instrument is a felony, the court shall
commit the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a state  mental hospital or di-
rector of a facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at  least 18
years of age, or to the  custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient
facility designated by the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age, if the  court
makes the following findings:
(A) The  defendant requires a hospital level of care due to public safety concerns if the
defendant is not hospitalized or in custody or the  acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s
qualifying mental disorder; and
(B) Based  on the findings resulting from a consultation described in ORS 161.365 (1), if
applicable, from any information provided by community-based mental  health providers or
any other sources, and  primary and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the
appropriate community restoration services  are not present and available in the community.
(b) If the defendant is committed under  this subsection, the community mental health program
director , or director’s designee,  shall at regular intervals, during any period  of commitment, re-
view available community [ resources ] restoration services  and maintain communication with  the
defendant and the superintendent of the state mental hospital or director of the facility in  order to
facilitate an efficient transition to treatment in the community when ordered.
(c) If  the court does not order the commitment of the defendant under this subsection,
the court shall proceed in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of  this section to determine and
order an appropriate action other than commitment.
[(4)(a) If the court  does not make a finding described in subsection (3) of this section, if commitment
is precluded  under subsection (5) of this section or if the court determines that care other than com-
mitment for incapacity to stand trial would better serve the defendant  and the community, the court
shall release the defendant on supervision for as long as the unfitness endures. ]
[(b) The court may order a community mental health program director providing treatment to the
defendant in the community to provide the court  with status reports on the defendant’s progress in
gaining or regaining fitness to proceed. ]
[(c) A community mental  health program director providing treatment to the defendant in the
community shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed. ]
[(5)(a) If the most  serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation, the court may not
commit the defendant under subsection (3) of this section. ]
[(b)] (4)(a) If the most  serious offense in the charging instrument is a misdemeanor, the court
may not commit the defendant [ under subsection (3) of this section ] to the custody of the super-
intendent of  a state mental hospital or director of a facility designated by the Oregon Health
Authority if the defendant is at  least 18 years of age, or to the custody of the director of a
secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the authority if  the defendant is
under 18 years of age,  unless the [ finding that the defendant requires a  hospital level of care due to
the defendant’s dangerousness  and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder
is based on a  recommendation by a certified evaluator as defined in ORS 161.309, or a community
mental health program director or the director’s designee,  that the defendant requires such level of
care.] court:
(A)(i) Receives a recommendation from a certified evaluator that the defendant requires
a hospital level of care due to the  acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder; and
(ii) Receives a recommendation from a community mental health program director,  or
director’s designee, that the appropriate community restoration services  are not present and
available in the community; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 10
(B) Determines that the defendant requires a hospital level of  care after making all of
the following written findings:
(i) The defendant needs a hospital level of care due to the  acuity of the symptoms of the
defendant’s qualifying mental disorder;
(ii) There are public safety concerns; and
(iii) The appropriate community restoration services  are not present and available in the
community.
[(c)] (b)  If at the time of determining the appropriate action for the case , the court is consid-
ering commitment under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection and:
(A) Has not received a recommendation  from  a certified evaluator  as to whether the defend-
ant requires a hospital level of care due to [ the defendant’s dangerousness and ] the acuity of symp-
toms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, the  court shall order a certified evaluator [ or a
community mental health program director, or the director’s  designee, ] to make such a recommenda-
tion.
(B) Has not received a recommendation  from the community mental health program di-
rector or  designee concerning whether appropriate community restoration services are
present and available in the community, the court shall order  the director or designee to
make such a recommendation.
[(d)] (c)  If the court does not order  the commitment of [ a] the  defendant [ described in this sub-
section to the state mental hospital or other facility ] under this subsection , the court shall [ hold a
hearing] proceed in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine and order an ap-
propriate action other than commitment.
(d) If the defendant  is committed under this subsection, the community mental health
program director, or director’s designee, shall at regular intervals, during  any period of
commitment, review available  community restoration services and maintain communication
with the defendant and  the superintendent of the state mental hospital or director of the
facility in order to facilitate an efficient transition to treatment in the community when or-
dered.
(5) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation, the  court may
not commit the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a  state mental hospital
or director of a facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least
18 years of age, or to the custody of the director of  a secure intensive community inpatient
facility designated by the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age.
(6)(a) If the court does  not order the commitment of the defendant under subsection (3)
or (4)  of this section, if commitment is precluded under subsection (5) of this section or if
the court determines  that care other than commitment would better serve the defendant and
the community, the court shall release the  defendant, pursuant to an order that the de-
fendant engage in community restoration services, until the defendant has gained  or re-
gained fitness to proceed,  or until the court finds there is no substantial probability that the
defendant will, within the foreseeable future, gain  or regain fitness to proceed. The court
may not order the defendant  to engage in community restoration services in another county
without permission from the other county.
(b) The court may order a community mental health program  director coordinating the
defendant’s treatment in the community to provide  the court with status reports on the
defendant’s progress in gaining  or regaining fitness to proceed. The director shall provide a
status report if the defendant is not complying with court-ordered restoration services.
(c) A community mental health program director coordinating the defendant’s treatment
in the community shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness  to proceed.
The notice shall be filed with  the court and may be filed electronically. The clerk of the court
shall cause copies of the notice to be delivered to both the district attorney and the counsel
for the defendant.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 11
[(6)] (d)  When a  defendant is [ released on supervision ] ordered to engage in community res-
toration services  under [ subsection (4) of this section ] this  subsection , the court may place condi-
tions that the court deems appropriate on the release,  including the requirement that the defendant
regularly report to [ the authority or a community mental health program ] a state mental hospital
or a certified evaluator  for examination  to determine if the defendant has gained or regained [ ca-
pacity to stand trial ] fitness to proceed .
[(7) When the court, on its own motion or upon the application  of the superintendent of the hospital
or director of the facility in which the defendant is committed, a person  examining the defendant as a
condition of release on supervision, or either party, determines, after a hearing, if a  hearing is re-
quested, that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding shall  be
resumed. If, however, the court is  of the view that so much time has elapsed since the commitment or
release of the defendant on supervision that it  would be unjust to resume the criminal proceeding, the
court on motion of either party may dismiss the charge and may order the defendant to be  discharged
or cause a proceeding to be commenced forthwith under ORS 426.070  to 426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to
427.290.]
[(8) The superintendent of a state hospital or director of a facility to which the defendant  is com-
mitted shall cause the defendant to be evaluated within 60 days  from the defendant’s delivery into the
superintendent’s or director’s custody, for the purpose of determining whether there is a substantial
probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will  have the capacity to stand trial. In addi-
tion, the superintendent or director shall: ]
[(a) Immediately notify the committing court if  the defendant, at any time, gains or regains the
capacity to stand trial or will never have the capacity to stand trial. ]
[(b) Within 90  days of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s custody, notify
the committing court that: ]
[(A) The defendant has the present capacity to stand trial; ]
[(B) There is no substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will  gain or
regain the capacity to stand trial; or ]
[(C) There is a substantial probability that,  in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or
regain the capacity to stand  trial. If the probability exists, the superintendent or director shall give the
court an estimate of  the time in which the defendant, with appropriate treatment, is expected to gain
or regain capacity. ]
[(c) Notify the court  if court-ordered involuntary medication is necessary for the defendant to gain
or regain the capacity to  proceed and, if appropriate, submit a report to the court under  ORS
161.372.]
[(9)(a) If the superintendent or director determines that there is a  substantial probability that, in
the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or regain the capacity to  stand trial, unless the court
otherwise orders, the defendant shall remain in the superintendent’s or director’s custody  where the
defendant shall receive treatment designed for the purpose of enabling the defendant to gain or  regain
capacity. In keeping  with the notice requirement under subsection (8)(b) of this section, the superinten-
dent or director shall, for the duration of the defendant’s period  of commitment, submit a progress re-
port to the committing court, concerning the defendant’s capacity or incapacity, at least  once every 180
days as measured from the date  of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s cus-
tody.]
[(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, if the superintendent or director deter-
mines that a defendant committed under this section is  no longer dangerous to self or others as a result
of a qualifying mental disorder,  that a hospital level of care is not necessary due to the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, or  that the
services and supervision necessary to allow the defendant  to gain or regain fitness to proceed are
available in the community, the superintendent or director shall file notice  of that determination with
the court.]
[(B) Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall order that  a community mental health program di-
rector or the director’s designee, within five judicial days: ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 12
[(i) Consult with the defendant and with any  local entity that would be responsible for supervising
the defendant if the defendant were to be released in the community  to determine whether services and
supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain or  regain fitness to proceed are available
in the community; and ]
[(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation. ]
[(C) Within 10 judicial days of receiving  the recommendations from the consultation, the court shall
hold a  hearing to determine an appropriate action in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section
as follows: ]
[(i) If, after consideration of the factors and possible actions described in subsection (2)(c)  of this
section, and any recommendations from the consultation described  in this paragraph, the court deter-
mines that the defendant remains dangerous to self or others as  a result of a qualifying mental disor-
der, a hospital level of care is necessary due to the  defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of
symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and the services and supervision  necessary to
allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed are  not available in the community, the court
may, after making specific findings to that effect, continue the commitment. ]
[(ii) If the  court does not make the findings described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph,
the court shall terminate the commitment and shall set a review  hearing seven days from the date of
the commitment termination for any defendant remaining in custody. At the review hearing, the court
shall consider all relevant information and determine an appropriate action in the case  as described
in subsection (2)(c) of this section. If the defendant remains in custody following the initial review
hearing, the court shall hold further review hearings every seven days thereafter until the  defendant
is no longer in custody. ]
[(c) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of an update to: ]
[(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or ]
[(B) An evaluation conducted under subsection (8) of this section, if the  defendant did not receive
an examination under ORS 161.365. ]
[(10)(a) A  defendant who remains committed under subsection (9) of this section shall be discharged
within a period of time that is reasonable for making a determination  concerning whether or not, and
when, the defendant may gain or regain capacity. However, regardless of the number of charges with
which the defendant is accused, in no event shall the defendant  be committed for longer than whichever
of the following, measured from the defendant’s initial custody date, is shorter: ]
[(A) Three years; or ]
[(B) A period of time equal to the maximum sentence the court could have imposed  if the defendant
had been convicted. ]
[(b) For purposes of calculating the maximum period of commitment described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection: ]
[(A) The initial custody date is the date on which  the defendant is first committed under this sec-
tion on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and ]
[(B) The defendant shall be given credit  against each charge alleged in the accusatory
instrument:]
[(i) For each day the defendant is committed under this section, whether the days  are consecutive
or are  interrupted by a period of time during which the defendant has gained or regained fitness to
proceed; and]
[(ii) Unless the defendant is charged  on any charging instrument with aggravated murder or a
crime listed in ORS 137.700  (2), for each day the defendant is held in jail before and after the date the
defendant is first committed, whether the days are consecutive  or are interrupted by a period of time
during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed. ]
[(11) The superintendent or director shall notify the  committing court of the defendant’s impending
discharge 30 days before the date on which the superintendent or director is required to  discharge the
defendant under subsection (10) of this section. ]
[(12) When the committing court receives a notice from the superintendent  or director under sub-
section (8) or (11) of this section concerning the defendant’s progress or lack thereof,  the committing
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 13
court shall determine, after a hearing, if a hearing  is requested, whether the defendant presently has
the capacity to stand trial. ]
[(13) If at any time the court determines that the defendant lacks the capacity to stand trial,  the
court shall further determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant, in  the fore-
seeable future, will gain or regain the capacity to stand trial and  whether the defendant is entitled to
discharge under subsection (10) of this section. If the court determines that there is no substantial
probability that the  defendant, in the foreseeable future, will gain or regain the capacity to stand trial
or that the defendant is entitled to discharge  under subsection (10) of this section, the court shall dis-
miss, without prejudice, all charges against the defendant and: ]
[(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or ]
[(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070 or 427.235 to 427.290. ]
[(14) All notices required under this section shall be filed with  the court and may be filed elec-
tronically. The clerk of the court shall  cause copies of the notices to be delivered to both the district
attorney and the counsel for the defendant. ]
[(15) If the defendant gains or  regains fitness to proceed, the term of any sentence received by the
defendant for conviction of the crime charged  shall be reduced by the amount of time the defendant
was committed under this section to the custody of a state mental hospital,  or to the custody of a secure
intensive community inpatient facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority. ]
[(16) Notwithstanding  the suspension of the criminal proceeding under subsection (2) of this section,
the fact that the defendant  is unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection through counsel and
without the personal participation of the defendant on  the grounds that the indictment is insufficient,
that the statute of limitations has run,  that double jeopardy principles apply or upon any other ground
at the discretion of the court which the court deems susceptible of fair determination prior to trial. ]
[(17) At the time that the court determines that the  defendant lacks fitness to proceed under sub-
section (2) of this section, the court shall notify the  defendant that federal law prohibits the defendant
from purchasing or possessing a firearm unless  the person obtains relief from the prohibition under
federal law. The court shall again notify the  defendant of the prohibition if the court finds that the
defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed under subsection (7) of this section. ]
[(18)(a) The entity or evaluator conducting  an examination of a defendant under this section shall
provide a copy of any report described in this section to the community mental health program director
or designee in: ]
[(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and ]
[(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence. ]
[(b) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be made available only: ]
[(A) To the court,  prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or defense at-
torney, defendant, community mental  health program director or designee and any facility in which the
defendant is housed; or ]
[(B) As ordered by a court. ]
[(c) Any facility in which a  defendant is housed may not use a report prepared under this section
to support a disciplinary action against the defendant. ]
[(d) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting attorney,  defense attorney or agent of the
prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a  report prepared under this section
with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law. ]
[(19) The court shall ensure that an order entered  under this section is provided, by the end of the
next judicial day, to  any entity ordered to provide services and supervision necessary to restore the
defendant’s fitness to proceed. ]
[(20) Unless the court orders otherwise or either party  objects, a defendant committed to a state
hospital or other facility, or a certified evaluator or other expert witness, may attend hearings held
under this section via simultaneous electronic transmission. ]
[(21)] (7) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule  standards for the recommendation
provided to the court described in subsection (2) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 14
INVOLUNTARY MEDICATION
SECTION 8.  ORS 161.372 is amended to read:
161.372. (1) If, at any point while the defendant is in the custody  of the superintendent of the
state mental hospital after commitment  under ORS 161.370,  the superintendent determines that
medication is the recommended treatment in order to allow the  defendant to gain or regain fitness
to proceed, the defendant  is refusing to take the recommended medication and the defendant cannot
be involuntarily medicated without a court order, the superintendent shall submit  a report of the
determination to the court.
(2) The report described in subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) Information regarding the benefits and side effects of each recommended medication;
(b) Information concerning the defendant’s refusal to take the recommended medication; and
(c) The likelihood  that the medication will allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to pro-
ceed.
(3)(a) Based upon the  report described in subsection (1) of this section, the prosecuting attorney
may file a motion requesting  that the court authorize the involuntary administration of medication
to the defendant. The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the motion to the defendant.
(b) The court shall hold a hearing on the motion if either the  prosecuting attorney or the de-
fendant requests a hearing. At the hearing, the court  shall determine whether to issue an order
authorizing the involuntary administration of medication to the defendant.
(c) In order to enter an order authorizing the involuntary administration of  medication to the
defendant, the court must find that:
(A) Involuntary medication of the defendant is not otherwise authorized by law;
(B) There are important state interests at stake in the prosecution of the defendant;
(C) The recommended medication will  significantly further the important state interests because:
(i) It is substantially likely that the medication will render the defendant fit to proceed; and
(ii) It is substantially unlikely that the medication will cause side effects that will  impair the
fairness of the criminal proceeding;
(D) Involuntary administration of medication is necessary to  further the important state inter-
ests because there are no alternative, less intrusive treatments that would produce the same  result
as the medication; and
(E) Administration of the medication is medically  appropriate because it is in the defendant’s
best medical interest in light of the defendant’s medical condition.
(d) A court  order authorizing the involuntary administration of medication to a defendant under
this section must specify:
(A) The specific medication or type of medications permitted to be administered to the  defend-
ant;
(B) The maximum dosage that may be administered; and
(C) The duration of  time that the state mental hospital may involuntarily medicate the defendant
before reporting back to the court on  the defendant’s mental condition and progress toward gaining
or regaining fitness to proceed. The duration of time shall not exceed the maximum period  of the
defendant’s commitment to the state mental hospital, or 180 calendar days, whichever is shorter.
(4)(a) Reports, motions and orders concerning the involuntary medication of  a defendant
under this section are confidential and may be made available only:
(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of  the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant,  community mental health program director or designee, state
mental hospital and any facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(b) Any facility in  which a defendant is housed may not use a report or document de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection to support a  disciplinary action against the de-
fendant.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 15
(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting  attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a  report or
document described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection with witnesses or victims as other-
wise permitted by law.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 9.  ORS 161.373 is amended to read:
161.373. (1) Unless  otherwise prohibited by law or for good cause, all public bodies, as defined
in ORS 174.109, and any private medical provider in possession of records concerning  the defendant,
shall, within five business days of receipt of the order, comply with a court order for the  release
of records to the state mental hospital or other facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority
for the purpose of conducting an examination or  evaluation under [ ORS 161.365 or 161.370] sections
2 to 5 of this 2021 Act .
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the Oregon Youth Authority,  the Department
of Corrections, a community  college district, a community college service district, a public univer-
sity, a school district or an education service district  may, after notifying the state hospital or other
facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority, comply with the  court order within 15 business
days of receipt of the order without good cause.
(3) As used in this section, in the case of a community college district, a community college
service district, a public university, a school district or an education service district, “business
day” does not include any day on which the central administration offices of the district or  univer-
sity are closed.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 161.390 is amended to read:
161.390. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules for the assignment  of persons to
state mental hospitals  or secure intensive community inpatient facilities  after commitment  under
ORS 161.365 and 161.370 and  for establishing standards for evaluation and treatment of persons
committed to a state hospital or a secure intensive community  inpatient facility or ordered to a
community mental health program under ORS 161.315 to 161.351.
(2) When  the Psychiatric Security Review Board requires the preparation of a predischarge or
preconditional release plan before a  hearing or as a condition of granting discharge or conditional
release for a person committed under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 to a  state hospital or a secure inten-
sive community inpatient facility for custody, care and treatment, the authority  is responsible for
and shall prepare the plan.
(3) In carrying out a conditional release plan  prepared under subsection (2) of this section, the
authority may contract  with a community mental health program, other public agency or private
corporation or an individual to  provide supervision and treatment for the conditionally released
person.
(4)(a) The board shall maintain and keep current the medical, social and  criminal history of all
persons committed to its jurisdiction. The confidentiality of  records maintained by the board shall
be determined pursuant to ORS 192.338, 192.345, 192.355 and 192.398.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, upon request of  the board, a state hospital, a commu-
nity mental health program  and any other health care service provider shall provide the board with
all medical records pertaining to a person committed to the jurisdiction of the board.
(5) The evidentiary phase  of a hearing conducted by the board under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 is
not a deliberation for purposes of ORS 192.690.
SECTION 11.  ORS 161.392 is amended to read:
161.392. (1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall adopt rules necessary to certify psychiatrists and
licensed psychologists for  the purpose of performing evaluations and examinations described in ORS
161.309[, 161.365] and 419C.524  and sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act . The rules must include a de-
scription of the standards and qualifications necessary  for certification. The authority may charge
a fee for certification under this section in an amount determined by rule.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 16
(2) The authority shall consult with the Psychiatric  Security Review Board about proposed rules
described in subsection (1) of this section before issuing the proposed rules for public comment  and
before adopting the rules.
SECTION 12.  ORS 181A.290 is amended to read:
181A.290. (1) The Department of Human Services, the Oregon  Health Authority, the Psychiatric
Security Review Board  and the Judicial Department shall provide the Department of State Police
with the minimum information necessary to identify persons who:
(a) Have been committed by a court to the Oregon  Health Authority under ORS 426.130, based
on a finding that the person is dangerous to self or others;
(b) Are subject to a court  order under ORS 426.130 or 426.133 prohibiting the person from pur-
chasing or possessing a firearm;
(c) Have been committed  by a court to the Department of Human Services under ORS 427.290,
based on a finding that the person is dangerous to self or others;
(d) Have been found by a court to lack fitness to proceed under ORS 161.370;
(e) Have been  found guilty except for insanity of a crime under ORS [ 161.295 to 161.370] 161.290
to 161.373;
(f) Have been found responsible except for insanity for an act under ORS 419C.411;
(g) Have  been placed under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board under ORS
161.315 to 161.351; or
(h) Have been committed to a state hospital  or facility under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 or 419C.529
to 419C.544.
(2) Upon receipt  of the information described in this section, the Department of State Police
shall access and maintain the  information and transmit the information to the federal government
as required under federal law.
(3) The Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health Authority, the Psychiatric  Security
Review Board and the Judicial Department shall  enter into agreements with the Department of
State Police describing the access to information provided under this section.
(4) The Department of State Police shall adopt rules:
(a) After  consulting with the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health Authority, the
Psychiatric Security Review Board and the Judicial Department, describing the type  of information
provided to the Department of State Police under this section; and
(b) Describing the method and manner of maintaining the information described in  this section
and transmitting the information to the federal government.
(5) As used in this section, “minimum information  necessary” means data elements or nominal
information that is necessary  or required under federal law to accurately identify a person described
in this section and includes the person’s name, date of birth, gender and reference information  that
identifies the originating agency or court and enables the originating  agency or court to locate an
underlying record or file  of a person described in this section. “Minimum information necessary”
does not include any medical, psychiatric or psychological information, case  histories or files of a
person described in this section or any record or file of an originating agency or court.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 430.230 is amended to read:
430.230. As used in ORS 430.230 to 430.236:
(1) “Comprehensive community supports and services” includes:
(a) Community-based mental health or substance use disorder treatment programs;
(b) [ Community-based services necessary to restore a defendant’s  fitness to proceed, as described
in ORS 161.370 (2)(a) ] Community restoration services as defined in section 2 of this 2021
Act;
(c) Evidence-based and tribal-based programs designed to reduce hospital and  jail utilization by
target populations; and
(d) Programs  aimed at diverting individuals with nonperson criminal charges experiencing men-
tal illness or substance use disorders from the criminal justice system.
(2) “County” includes a single county or a regional consortium of counties.
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 17
SECTION 13a. If House Bill 3104 becomes law, section 48, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 3104) (amending ORS 430.230), is repealed.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 14. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 15. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 7, 2021
Repassed by Senate June 9, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 7, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 295 (SB 295-B) Page 18